Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Cross references.

Equitable principles pertaining to administration of estates generally, §

23-2-90

et seq.

Estate taxes, T. 48, C. 12.

Law reviews.

For article, “Pitfalls in Probate Practice and Procedure,” see 21 Ga. B.J. 169 (1958).

For article, “Improving Georgia’s Probate Code,” see 4 Ga. L. Rev. 505 (1970).

For article discussing important elements of estate planning and will construction, see 9 Ga. St. B.J. 197 (1973).

For article discussing developments in the law of wills, trusts and administration of estates in Georgia from 1976 to 1977, see 29 Mercer L. Rev. 291 (1977).

For note, “Wills and the Attorney-Client Privilege,” see 14 Ga. L. Rev. 325 (1980).

For annual survey of law on wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 35 Mercer L. Rev. 341 (1983).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 36 Mercer L. Rev. 375 (1984).

For article surveying trust and estate law in 1984-1985, see 37 Mercer L. Rev. 443 (1985).

For article, “Probate and Tax Checklist for Estates in Georgia,” see 23 Ga. St. B.J. 140 (1987).

For annual survey of law on wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 39 Mercer L. Rev. 363 (1987).

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 40 Mercer L. Rev. 471 (1988) and 41 Mercer L. Rev. 411 (1989).

For annual survey of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 42 Mercer L. Rev. 491 (1990).

For annual survey of wills, trusts, and administration, see 43 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (1991).

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 44 Mercer L. Rev. 445 (1992).

For annual survey article on law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 45 Mercer L. Rev. 475 (1993).

For annual survey article on the law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 46 Mercer L. Rev. 517 (1994).

For annual survey article on the law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 49 Mercer L. Rev. 363 (1997).

For annual survey article on wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 50 Mercer L. Rev. 381 (1998).

For article, “Immortal Fame:
Publicity Rights, Taxation, and the Power of Testation,” see 44 Ga. L. Rev. 1 (1999).

For annual survey article discussing wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 51 Mercer L. Rev. 487 (1999).

For annual survey article discussing wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 481 (2000).

For article, “Tax Apportionment Problems under the Georgia Probate Code,” see 8 Ga. St. B.J. 16 (2003).

For annual survey of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 403 (2005).

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).